Illinois, session 104th, HB3763.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-4.13f as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.13f new)7    Sec. 12-4.13f. SNAP minimum benefit level. If a 8household's monthly benefit amount under the federal 9Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program is determined to be 10less than $75, the State shall pay an additional amount to 11increase the household's total monthly benefit to $75. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect October 131, 2025.